Utah statutes.
32B-8a-403.   Statement by transferee.

(1)  Within 30 days after the filing of a transfer application under Section 32B-8a-302 for transfer of a retail license, the transferee shall file with the department a statement executed under penalty of perjury that the consideration as set forth in the escrow agreement required by Section 32B-8a-401 is deposited with the escrow holder.

(2)  At the time the statement described in Subsection (1) is filed with the department, the transferee shall submit a copy of the statement to:

(a)  the transferor; and

(b)  the escrow holder.

(3)  The department may extend the 30-day period specified by this section for a period not to exceed an additional 30 days, except that a retail license may not be transferred until the statement required by this section is received by the department.

(4)  This section does not apply to a transfer for which a guaranty of payment is filed pursuant to Section 32B-8a-404.

